Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for a grant to assess the efficacy of installing a continuous emission monitoring system to accurately measure the frequency and concentration of lead in the air emissions of a permitted facility to enable the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency to continuously monitor compliance with emission limits. new text end new text begin (b) In awarding a grant, the commissioner must give priority to a facility that has exceeded emission limits for lead multiple times within the last five years and is located within one mile of significant residential populations exposed to the facility's air emissions. new text end new text begin (c) A grant awarded under this section may be used to pay up to 100 percent of the purchase price and installation costs for a continuous emission monitoring system. new text end new text begin (d) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph (a), up to $....... may be used to reimburse the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency for administrative costs and to provide technical assistance to the grant recipient. new text end new text begin (e) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin (f) For the purposes of this section, "continuous emissions monitoring system" means the total, integrated equipment required to continuously sample, analyze, measure, and record real-time concentrations of pollutants from an emission source. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end